Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2171.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect and improve the general health and welfare of the people of the State of Vermont in the fields of environmental sanitation, water treatment, domestic supply, and hydronically related hot water heating, by authorizing and enforcing rules and regulations for properly designed, acceptably installed, and adequately maintained plumbing, water treatment, and hydronically related water heating systems and by licensing qualified plumbers and qualified heating and water treatment specialists.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 215

, § 1, eff. June 2, 1959; amended

1993, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2172.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall be construed as follows:

“Public water system” or “public sewerage disposal system” means any system supplying or serving 15 or more customers, each family, tenement, store, or other establishment being considered a single customer.

“Master plumber” means any person, licensed under this chapter, that, as a business, installs plumbing systems, hires or employs a person or persons to do plumbing work, or supervises journey plumbers or apprentice plumbers in completion of their work.

“Journeyman plumber” means any person licensed under this chapter who installs plumbing and water treatment or heating specialties under the direction of a master plumber. A journeyman plumber may supervise an apprentice employed by a master plumber and under the master plumber’s direction. A journeyman plumber shall not act as a master plumber.

“Apprentice plumber” means any person, employed by a master plumber or under the direction of a master plumber or a journeyman plumber, who is engaged in learning and assisting in the installation of plumbing and water treatment or heating specialties under an apprenticeship program properly registered with the Vermont Apprenticeship Council. An apprentice plumber shall be supervised on the job by either a master or a journeyman plumber.

“Plumbing” is the art of installing pipes, fixtures, and other apparatus for bringing in the water supply and removing liquid and water carried wastes and drainage venting systems within or on any building or structure.

“Board” means the Plumber’s Examining Board created under this chapter.

“State plumbing inspector” means a master plumber or duly qualified employee of the Department designated to enforce the rules and regulations pursuant to this chapter.

“Municipal inspector” means a plumbing inspector authorized to conduct municipal inspections pursuant to this chapter.

“Specialist” means any person licensed under this chapter who performs work in connection with water treatment and heating, or both, or performs that work as a principal business or an auxiliary to a principal business for the person’s own account as designated on the person’s license.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Safety.

“Legislative body” means the selectboard, the alderboard, city council, or board of trustees of a municipality or an incorporated village.

“Work notice” means the notice required to be filed under this chapter by a licensee prior to commencement of work.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 215

, § 2, eff. June 2, 1959; amended

1993, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 8

, § 10, eff. April 25, 2005.

§ 2173.
Rules adopted by the Board.

The Plumber’s Examining Board may, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, make and revise such plumbing rules as necessary for protection of the public health, except that no rule of the Board may require the installation or maintenance of a water heater at a minimum temperature. To the extent that a rule of the Board conflicts with this subsection or with 18 V.S.A. chapter 40, that rule shall be invalid and unenforceable. The rules shall be in effect in every city, village, and town having a public water system or public sewerage system and apply to all premises connected to the systems and all public buildings containing plumbing or water treatment and heating specialties whether they are connected to a public water or sewerage system. The local board of health and the Commissioner of Public Safety shall each have authority to enforce these rules. The rules shall be limited to minimum performance standards reasonably necessary for the protection of the public against accepted health hazards and shall be consistent with any minimum efficiency standards for plumbing fixtures adopted under 9 V.S.A. chapter 74. The Board may, if it finds it practicable to do so, adopt the provisions of a nationally recognized plumbing code and as needed shall adopt a Vermont-specific amendment to the adopted code to ensure that it is consistent with any minimum efficiency standards for plumbing fixtures adopted under 9 V.S.A. chapter 74.

The Commissioner shall make rules and adopt procedures and priorities for inspections and enforcement. Installations regulated by the Board shall be inspected by a State plumbing inspector. The Commissioner may set priorities based on consideration of health risks to persons and property, type and size of the building, and the complexity and size of the installation or job.

The Commissioner or any State plumbing inspector designated by the Commissioner shall have the authority to enter any premises in which an installation subject to the rules of the Board is being or has been installed, replaced, or repaired for the purpose of performing inspections necessary to carry out inspection responsibilities under this subchapter. If the owner or occupant of the premises refuses entry, the Commissioner may apply to any Superior Court to issue an order enforcing the right of entry.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 215

, § 3, eff. June 2, 1959; amended

1979, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 21, 1988;

1993, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 8

, § 11, eff. April 25, 2005;

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 10a;

2017, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2174.
Municipal rules and regulations; municipal inspections.

The legislative body may establish inspection procedures and appoint trained, qualified master plumbers to conduct municipal inspections. If the Board determines that the inspection procedures, training, and qualifications of the municipal plumbing inspectors are sufficient, the Commissioner may assign the responsibility to inspect plumbing installations within the municipality to the municipality. Municipal inspection standards shall be, at a minimum, equal to State standards. Municipal standards may exceed State standards with approval of the Board. Municipal standards shall not prohibit implementation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 40. An assignment of responsibility under this subsection shall not affect the authority of the Board or the Commissioner under this subchapter.

Inspection procedures, including the issuance of work notices, shall be the same as for State plumbing inspections. A municipal inspector shall have the authority to enter a premises to carry out inspection responsibilities in accordance with the rules and procedures established by the Board. The legislative body may also establish reasonable fees for inspections, which shall be in lieu of fees charged by the State.

If, after inspection of the plumbing installation, a violation of the rules of the Board or the inspection procedures of the municipality is found, a municipal inspector may:

Issue an order directing the plumber of record or the owner of the premises in which the violation is found to correct or remove the violation.

Invalidate the work permit.

Pursue disciplinary procedures under section 2178 of this chapter.

A person aggrieved by an action of a municipal inspector or municipality under subsection (c) of this section may appeal to the Commissioner by filing a written application for a hearing with the Commissioner within 15 days after receiving written notice of the action. A person filing an application under this subsection shall be entitled to notice and an opportunity for a hearing before the Commissioner within 45 days. Within 30 days after the hearing, the Commissioner shall issue an order amending, modifying, or affirming the action by the municipal inspector or municipality.

Municipal inspectors shall participate in training provided by the Department of Public Safety. The Department of Public Safety shall also provide continuing consultation, review, and assistance to municipal inspectors.

The Commissioner or the Board may revoke an assignment of responsibility to a municipality granted under this section if the Commissioner or the Board determines that the training or qualifications of the municipal inspectors or the inspection procedure adopted by the legislative body is insufficient.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 215

, § 4, eff. June 2, 1959; amended

1967, No. 295

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. March 20, 1968;

1979, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 21, 1988;

1993, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 8

, § 12, eff. April 25, 2005;

2017, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2175.
Work notice; fees; enforcement; appeals; penalties.

Work in installations subject to the rules of the Board shall not commence until a work notice has been received and validated by the Department of Public Safety. The following schedule of work notice fees shall be paid to the Commissioner or a designated representative prior to the validation of a work notice.

For all plumbing work, identified as a priority for inspection and review under subsection 2173(b) of this title, the fee shall be:

$10.00 for each plumbing fixture described as a washing machine, dishwasher, grease trap, oil interceptor, sand interceptor, sewage ejector pump, water closet, urinal, bidet, disposal, drinking fountain, water cooler, lavatory, bathtub, shower, sink, hose bib, floor drain, or similar device. The total shall not be less than $50.00.

$15.00 for each plumbing fixture described as a water heater, hydronic heating unit, domestic hot water coil, or water treatment device.

For all plumbing work, not identified as a priority for inspection and review under subsection 2173(b) of this title, the fee shall be $50.00.

At the discretion of the Commissioner, whenever an owner or licensed plumber requests for the owner’s or licensed plumber’s benefit that an inspection be made outside the normal working hours, all fees payable by the owner under this section shall be paid in an amount twice that indicated under this section.

If the Commissioner or designee finds a violation of the rules adopted under this chapter, the Commissioner or designee may:

Order the owner of the premises in which the violation is found or the owner’s agent or the person performing the work to correct or remove the violation.

Invalidate a work notice or issue a cease and desist order, or both.

Order any public water and sewerage company or to any private party furnishing water to such installation not to connect or to disconnect water service or sewer service, or both, from all or a portion of the premises until the violation is removed or corrected.

Order any company supplying fuel service to the premises to disconnect the fuel supply until the cited violation has been removed or corrected.

Issue an administrative citation.

Pursue any combination of options under this subsection.

Any person aggrieved under this chapter may request the Commissioner to reconsider the refusal or order. A request for reconsideration shall be made in writing and filed with the Commissioner within 15 days after receipt of the written order or notice of refusal. Within 30 days of receipt of the request for reconsideration, the Commissioner shall review the refusal or order and shall issue an order amending, modifying, or affirming the original refusal or order. A person aggrieved by the Commissioner’s decision under this section may appeal to the Superior Court in the district in which the violation occurred. The court shall hear the matter de novo.

The Commissioner may after notice and an opportunity for hearing, assess an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00 per violation against a person, licensed or unlicensed, who violates this chapter, or any order lawfully issued under this chapter. Penalties assessed shall be related to the severity of the violation.

On application by the Commissioner, the Superior Court in the county in which a violation occurs may issue an order enjoining or restraining the violation. An election by the Commissioner to proceed under this subsection shall not limit or restrict the Commissioner’s authority to assess an administrative penalty under subsection (d) of this section.

Violation of any rule adopted under this subchapter shall be prima facie evidence of negligence in any civil action for damages that results from the violation.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 215

, § 5, eff. June 2, 1959; amended

1969, No. 84

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1969;

1979, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 49

, § 146;

2005, No. 8

, § 13, eff. April 25, 2005;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 29, 2010.

§ 2176.
Existing buildings.

The rules adopted under sections 2173, 2174, and 2175 of this title shall not apply to existing private dwellings and public buildings except as the plumbing systems in them may be altered in the future.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 215

, § 6, eff. June 2, 1959; amended

1987, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 21, 1988;

1993, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.